North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 2. Voluntary Agricultural Districts.

§ 106-737.
Qualifying farmland.

In order for farmland to qualify for inclusion in a voluntary agricultural district or an enhanced voluntary agricultural district under Part 1 or Part 2 of this Article, it must be real property that:

Is used for bona fide farm purposes, as that term is defined in G.S. 106-743.4(a) and G.S. 160D-903.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-390, s. 11 effective September 13, 2005.

Is managed in accordance with the Soil Conservation Service defined erosion control practices that are addressed to highly erodable land; and

Is the subject of a conservation agreement, as defined in

G.S. 121-35

, between the local government administering the voluntary agricultural district program and the owner of such land that prohibits nonfarm use or development of such land for a period of at least 10 years, except for the creation of not more than three lots that meet applicable county and municipal zoning and subdivision regulations. The form of the conservation agreement shall be approved by the agricultural advisory board created under

G.S. 106-739

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 3, 11; 2011-219, s. 1; 2021-78, s. 1.

§ 106-737.1.
Revocation of conservation agreement.

By written notice to the local government administering the voluntary agricultural district program, the landowner may revoke this conservation agreement. Such revocation shall result in loss of qualifying farm status.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, s. 3; 2021-78, s. 1.

§ 106-738.
Voluntary agricultural districts.

An ordinance adopted under this Part shall provide:

For the establishment of voluntary agricultural districts upon the execution of a conservation agreement as provided in G.S. 106-737(4).

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-78, s. 1, effective July 2, 2021.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-78, s. 1, effective July 2, 2021.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-78, s. 1, effective July 2, 2021.

The minimum size, including acreage; number of tracts; and appropriate proximity of multiple tracts of agricultural land, forestland, or horticultural land that may comprise a voluntary agricultural district.

The purpose of such agricultural districts shall be to increase identity and pride in the agricultural community and its way of life and to decrease the likelihood of legal disputes, such as nuisance actions between farm owners and their neighbors, and other negative impacts on properly managed farms. The county or city that adopted an ordinance under this Part may take such action as it deems appropriate to encourage the formation of such districts and to further their purposes and objectives.

A county ordinance adopted pursuant to this Part is effective within the unincorporated areas of the county. A city ordinance adopted pursuant to this Part is effective within the corporate limits of the city. A city may amend its ordinances in accordance with G.S. 160A-383.2 with regard to agricultural districts within its planning jurisdiction.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 3, 12; 2021-78, s. 1.

§ 106-739.
Agricultural advisory board.

An ordinance adopted under this Part or Part 3 of this Article shall provide for the establishment of an agricultural advisory board, organized and appointed by the board of county commissioners or the city council adopting the ordinance. The county or city that adopted the ordinance may confer upon this advisory board authority to:

Review and make recommendations or decisions concerning the establishment and modification of agricultural districts. The board of county commissioners or the city council may make decisions regarding the establishment and modification of voluntary agricultural districts or may delegate that authority to the agricultural advisory board. If the authority is delegated to the agricultural advisory board, the agricultural advisory board’s decisions shall be appealable to the board of county commissioners or city council by an owner of land that has been denied enrollment in a voluntary agricultural district or has been removed from a voluntary agricultural district by the agricultural advisory board.

(1a)

Execute agreements with landowners necessary for enrollment of land in a voluntary agricultural district.

Review and make recommendations concerning any ordinance or amendment adopted or proposed for adoption under this Part or Part 3 of this Article.

Hold public hearings on public projects likely to have an impact on agricultural operations, particularly if such projects involve condemnation of all or part of any qualifying farm.

Advise the governing board of the county or city that adopted the ordinance on projects, programs, or issues affecting the agricultural economy or way of life within the county.

Perform other related tasks or duties assigned by the governing board of the county or city that adopted the ordinance.

The members of the agricultural advisory board shall be chosen to provide the broadest possible representation of the geographical regions of the local government and to represent, to the extent possible, all segments of agricultural production existing within the local government. A majority of the members of the agricultural advisory board shall be actively engaged in agriculture.

The agricultural advisory board may, at the discretion of the board of county commissioners or the city council, utilize an existing local government agency for the purpose of administration, record keeping, and other related tasks or duties.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 3, 13; 2021-78, s. 1.

§ 106-740.
Public hearings on condemnation of farmland.

An ordinance adopted under this Part or Part 3 of this Article may provide that no State or local public agency or governmental unit may formally initiate any action to condemn any interest in qualifying farmland within a voluntary agricultural district under this Part or an enhanced voluntary agricultural district under Part 3 of this Article until such agency has requested the local agricultural advisory board established under

G.S. 106-739

to hold a public hearing on the proposed condemnation.

Following a public hearing held pursuant to this section, the board shall prepare and submit written findings and a recommendation to the decision-making body of the agency proposing acquisition.

The board designated to hold the hearing shall have 30 days after receiving a request under this section to hold the public hearing and submit its findings and recommendations to the agency.

The agency may not formally initiate a condemnation action while the proposed condemnation is properly before the advisory board within these time limitations.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 3, 14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-390, s. 14, effective September 13, 2005, in the introductory paragraph, inserted “this Part or Part 3 of”
and “under this Part or an enhanced voluntary agricultural district under Part 3 of this Article.”

§ 106-741.
Record notice of proximity to farmlands.

All counties shall require that land records include some form of notice reasonably calculated to alert a person researching the title of a particular tract that such tract is located within one-half mile of the property line of any tract of land enrolled in a voluntary agricultural district.

In no event shall the county or any of its officers, employees, or agents be held liable in damages for any misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance occurring in good faith in connection with the duties or obligations imposed by any ordinance adopted under subsection (a).

In no event shall any cause of action arise out of the failure of a person researching the title of a particular tract to report to any person the proximity of the tract to a qualifying farm or voluntary agricultural district as defined in this Article.

In no event shall any cause of action arise out of the failure of a person licensed under Chapters 93A or 93E of the General Statutes for failure to report to any person the proximity of a tract to a qualifying farm or voluntary agricultural district as defined in this Article.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, s. 3; 2018-113, s. 9; 2021-78, s. 1.

§ 106-742.
Waiver of water and sewer assessments.

A county or a city that has adopted an ordinance under this Part may provide by ordinance that its water and sewer assessments be held in abeyance, with or without interest, for farms, whether inside or outside of a voluntary agricultural district, until improvements on such property are connected to the water or sewer system for which the assessment was made.

The ordinance may provide that, when the period of abeyance ends, the assessment is payable in accordance with the terms set out in the assessment resolution.

Statutes of limitations are suspended during the time that any assessment is held in abeyance without interest.

If an ordinance is adopted under this section, then the assessment procedures followed under Article 9 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes or Article 10 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, whichever applies, shall conform to the terms of this ordinance with respect to qualifying farms that entered into conservation agreements while such ordinance was in effect.

Nothing in this section is intended to diminish the authority of counties or cities to hold assessments in abeyance under

G.S. 153A-201

or

G.S. 160A-237

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 3, 15.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-390, s. 15, effective September 13, 2005, inserted “or a city that has adopted an ordinance under this Part” in subsection (a); inserted “of the General Statutes or Article 10 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, whichever applies” in subsection (d); and in subsection (e), inserted “or cities” preceding “to hold assessments” and added “G.S. 160A-237” at the end.

§ 106-743.
Local ordinances.

A county or a city adopting an ordinance under this Part or Part 3 of this Article may consult with the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture or the Commissioner’s staff before adoption, and shall record the ordinance with the Commissioner’s office after adoption. Thereafter, the county or city shall submit to the Commissioner at least once a year, a written report including the status, progress, number of enrolled farms and acres, and activities of its farmland preservation program under this Part or Part 3 of this Article.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1025, s. 1; 2005-390, ss. 3, 16; 2021-78, s. 1.